Utah statutes.
63A-2-102.   Director of division -- Appointment.

(1)  The executive director of the department shall appoint the director of the Division of Purchasing and General Services with the approval of the governor.

(2)  The director of the Division of Purchasing and General Services is also the state's chief procurement officer.

